Hawaii statutes.
[§431C-13] Examination reports. (a)
Examination reports shall be comprised of only facts appearing upon the books,
from the testimony of its officers, directors, employees, or agents or other
persons examined concerning its affairs, and such conclusions and
recommendations as the examiners find reasonably warranted from the facts.

(b) No later than sixty days following
completion of the examination, the examiner in charge shall file with the
commissioner a verified written report of examination under oath. Upon receipt
of the verified report, the commissioner shall transmit the report to the
licensee examined, together with a notice that shall afford the licensee
examined a reasonable opportunity of not more than thirty days to make a
written submission or rebuttal with respect to any matters contained in the
examination report and which shall become part of the report or to request a
hearing on any matter in dispute.

(c) In the event the commissioner determines
that regulatory action is appropriate as a result of an examination, the
commissioner may initiate any proceedings or actions provided by law. [L 2012,
c 256, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next